Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
SECURITY AND PROOF OF
FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY IN
CONNECTION WITH ACCIDENTS

42-7-301. Security and proof of financial responsibility for the future required under certain circumstances.

Unless exempt under section 42-7-302, an operator or owner named in an accident report required to be filed pursuant to section 42-4-1606 shall file with the director, according to the procedure provided by this section, both:

Security, in an amount specified after consideration of the accident report and written substantiation of such report as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, which is sufficient to satisfy any judgments for damages or injuries resulting from the accident as may be recovered against such operator or owner but which in no event shall exceed the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars; and

Proof of financial responsibility for the future.

Based upon a report filed pursuant to section 42-4-1606, the director shall determine whether an operator or owner is required to comply with the provisions of this article and, if so, shall:

Within fifteen days after receipt of the accident report, inform each such operator and each such owner of such requirement and that the operator or owner's license or nonresident's operating privilege will be suspended if the operator or owner fails to comply with the provisions of this article;

Within sixty days after receipt of the accident report, send written notice of the requirement of filing security and proof of financial responsibility for the future to each such owner and each such operator at his or her last-known address, by first-class mail pursuant to section 42-2-119 (2).

The notice specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall state that:

The license or nonresident's operating privilege of the person so notified is subject to suspension and shall be suspended unless such person, within twenty days after the mailing of such notice by the director, establishes that the requirements of this section are not applicable to such person or that such person previously filed or then files both security and proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

Any person having a claim for property damage or personal injury may be required by the director to substantiate such claim by written statement sworn to by a person experienced in estimating the cost of repairing the property damaged and a written report as to the personal injury sworn to by a licensed physician.

The person notified is entitled to a hearing and judicial review as provided in section 42-7-201.

The date on which such person's license or nonresident's operating privilege would otherwise be suspended shall be postponed during the pendency of such hearing if the request for a hearing is made within twenty days after the mailing of said notice and if the person files security and evidence of current liability insurance in the respondent's name.

Upon expiration of such twenty-day period without a request for hearing or compliance with the contents of the notice as specified in subsection (3) of this section, such person's license or nonresident's operating privilege shall be suspended unless and until such person files security and proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

When no accident report is filed or when erroneous or incomplete information is given, the director, with regard to the matters set forth in this article, shall, after receipt of correct information with respect to said matters, take whatever appropriate action is indicated, consistent with the provisions of this article.

No policy or bond shall be effective under this section unless issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do business in this state, but the surety requirements of this section may be satisfied by evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S. However, if a motor vehicle was not registered in this state, or if a motor vehicle was registered elsewhere than in this state at the effective date of the policy or bond, or the most recent renewal thereof, such policy or bond shall not be effective under this section unless the insurance company or surety company, if not authorized to do business in this state, executes a power of attorney authorizing the director to accept, on its behalf, service of notice or process in any action upon such policy or bond arising out of such accident.

The security required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may, in whole or in part, take the form of a contract between a person having a claim for property damage or personal injury and the operator or owner. Any such contract shall require notice by first-class mail to any obligor in default at the obligor's last-known address and allowing at least a ten-day period after mailing for the obligor to cure the default before remedies become available.
(7) (a) (I) The security required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may, in whole or in part, take the form of a contract between a person having a claim for property damage or personal injury and the operator or owner. Any such contract shall require notice by first-class mail to any obligor in default at the obligor's last-known address and allowing at least a ten-day period after mailing for the obligor to cure the default before remedies become available.

The director shall prescribe the form of any contract authorized by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a).

The director shall immediately suspend the license of a person obligated under a contract used as security pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (7), upon receipt of evidence from the creditor in the form of an affidavit that:

The obligor has defaulted on any payment obligation under the contract;

Notice of the default has been sent to the obligor by certified mail; and

The obligor has failed to cure the default within fifteen days after the date of mailing of the notice.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2476, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3)(d) amended, p. 961, § 22, effective May 25; (7) added, p. 1215, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(1), IP(2), and (3)(d) amended, p. 1210, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 464, § 4, effective August 4.

42-7-301.5. Proof of financial responsibility.

Any person who presents an altered or counterfeit letter or altered or counterfeit insurance identification card from an insurer or agent for the purpose of proving financial responsibility for purposes of this article shall be in violation of section 18-5-104, C.R.S., and the minimum fine shall be one thousand dollars. A second or subsequent presentation is a violation of section 18-5-104, C.R.S., and the minimum fine shall be one thousand five hundred dollars.

Any person who alters or creates a counterfeit letter or insurance identification card for another violates section 18-5-104, C.R.S., and shall be punished by a minimum fine of one thousand dollars. A second or subsequent alteration or creation of a counterfeit letter or insurance identification card is a violation of section 18-5-104, C.R.S., and the fine shall be one thousand five hundred dollars.

It shall be an affirmative defense that the person did not know or could not have known that the presented document was altered or counterfeit.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1446, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 525, § 14, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 2649, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 794, § 5, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2006:

(4) repealed, p. 1010, § 3, effective July 1.

42-7-302. Exemptions from requirement of filing security and proof of financial responsibility for the future.

The requirement of filing security and proof of financial responsibility for the future pursuant to section 42-7-301 shall not apply:

To any person who qualifies as a self-insurer under section 42-7-501 or who operates a motor vehicle for a self-insurer under section 42-7-501;

To any person who has been released from liability, or finally adjudicated not liable, prior to the date the director would otherwise suspend a license or a nonresident's operating privilege under section 42-7-301 (4);

To the state of Colorado or any political subdivision thereof or any municipality therein;

To the operation by any employee of the federal government of any motor vehicle while acting within the scope of such employment;

Repealed.

To the operator or owner if such owner had in effect at the time of such accident an automobile liability policy with respect to the motor vehicle involved in such accident;

To the operator, if not the owner of such motor vehicle, if there was in effect at the time of such accident an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to the operation of motor vehicles not owned by that person;

To the operator or owner if the liability of such operator or owner for damages resulting from such accident is, in the judgment of the director, covered by any other form of liability insurance policy or bond or deposit as provided in section 42-7-418;

To the owner of a motor vehicle if at the time of the accident the vehicle was being operated without the owner's express or implied permission, or was parked by a person who had been operating such motor vehicle without such permission.

In determining whether any person is exempt from the requirements of section 42-7-301, the director shall rely upon reports or other information submitted and, when requested by any person affected by an accident to make a finding of fact, shall consider the report of the investigating officer, if any, the accident reports, and any affidavits of persons having knowledge of the facts.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2477, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1)(e) repealed, p. 1210, § 7, effective July 1.

42-7-303. Duration of suspension.

The license or nonresident's operating privilege suspended under section 42-7-301 shall remain so suspended and not be renewed, nor shall any such license be issued to such person, unless there is filed with the director evidence satisfactory to the director that such person has been released from liability, has entered into a contract used as security pursuant to section 42-7-301 (7), or has been finally adjudicated not liable, or until:

Such person deposits and files or there has been deposited and filed on behalf of such person the security and proof of financial responsibility for the future required under section 42-7-301; or

Three years have elapsed following the date of such accident and evidence satisfactory to the director has been filed with the director that during such period no action for damages arising out of such accident has been instituted, and such person has filed or then files and maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in section 42-7-408; except that a contract used as security pursuant to section 42-7-301 (7) may provide for a different period of time; or

Three years have elapsed since the failure to timely cure any default, after notice, under a contract used as security pursuant to section 42-7-301 (7) and evidence satisfactory to the director has been filed with the department showing that no civil action to enforce the contract has been filed during such period.

If the director determines that the driver is not responsible for any damages to any other party as a result of the accident, the driver may:

Prevent a suspension from occurring by filing future proof of liability insurance pursuant to section 42-7-408; or

Reinstate a license, if a suspension has already occurred, by filing future proof of liability insurance pursuant to section 42-7-408 and paying the reinstatement fee.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2478, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 1216, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) added, p. 1210, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1648, § 42, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 464, § 5, effective August 4.

42-7-304. Custody and disposition of security.

Security deposited in compliance with the requirements of section 42-7-301 shall be placed by the director in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be applied only to the payment of a judgment rendered against the person on whose behalf the deposit was made, for damages arising out of the accident in question in an action at law begun not later than one year after the date of such accident. Such deposit or any balance thereof shall be returned to the depositor or the depositor's personal representative, or the person designated by either of them, when evidence satisfactory to the director has been filed with the director that there has been a release from liability, or a final adjudication of nonliability, or a warrant for confession of judgment, or a duly acknowledged agreement, or whenever, after the expiration of one year from the date of the accident, or within one year after the date of deposit of any security, the director shall be given reasonable evidence that there is no such action pending and no judgment rendered in such action left unpaid.

The director may reduce the amount of security ordered in any case within six months after the date of the accident if, in the director's judgment, the amount originally ordered is excessive. In case the security originally ordered has been deposited, the excess deposit over the reduced amount ordered shall be returned immediately to the depositor or the depositor's personal representative, regardless of any other provisions of this article.

It is the duty of any person having a claim against the security deposited under the provisions of section 42-7-301, on or before the expiration of one year from the date of the accident, to notify the director in writing under oath that there has been a release of liability, or a final adjudication of nonliability, or a warrant for confession of judgment, or a duly acknowledged agreement or that there is no action pending and no judgment rendered in any such action left unpaid or of any action taken on said claim which has not been finally determined.

If any claimant fails to notify the director in writing under oath as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the director shall notify the state treasurer to that effect and the state treasurer may, upon receipt of said notification, void the obligation provided for in section 42-7-301 and release and return the security to the depositor. The state treasurer shall then be fully and completely released from any further obligation or liability in relation thereto.

Where said depositor cannot be located, the state treasurer shall notify the depositor by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the last-known address of said depositor, advising said depositor that the depositor must either appear and claim the security deposited within thirty days from the date of receipt of said letter, or said security will escheat to the general fund of the state of Colorado. If said depositor does not appear within the thirty-day period, the state treasurer shall void the obligation as provided in section 42-7-301, and the security shall escheat to the general fund of the state of Colorado, relieving the state treasurer of any further obligation or liability in relation thereto.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2479, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Cross references:

For unclaimed property, see article 13 of title 38.